New York, session 2025-2026, S7832.
do enact as follows:
1 Section 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, Daniel Woolley,
2 who was employed by the town of Clarkstown as a police officer from
3 February 1991 to February 2023 and who retired from service on February
4 25, 2023, and who was diagnosed with an aortic aneurysm of the heart on
5 February 15, 2024, and who, as of the effective date of this act, is
6 receiving a service retirement benefit from the New York state and local
7 police and fire retirement system, shall be entitled to apply for an
8 accidental disability retirement from the New York state and local
9 police and fire retirement system pursuant to section 363 of the retire-
10 ment and social security law if, within one year of the effective date
11 of this act, he shall file a written request with the state comptroller.
12 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.
FISCAL NOTE.--Pursuant to Legislative Law, Section 50:
This bill would entitle Daniel Woolley, a service retiree of the New
York State and Local Police and Fire Retirement System (NYSLPFRS), to
apply for an accidental disability retirement, pursuant to section 363
of the retirement and social security law.
There will be an immediate past service cost of $74,000 as of February
1, 2027. This cost will be shared by the State of New York and the local
participating employers in NYSLPFRS and spread over future billing
cycles.
EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets
[ ] is old law to be omitted.
LBD10096-08-6

S. 7832--A 2
Summary of relevant resources:
Membership data as of March 31, 2025 was used to measure the impact of
the bill, the same data used in the Actuarial Valuations dated April 1,
2025. Distributions and other statistics can be found in the 2025 Report
of the Actuary and the 2025 Annual Comprehensive Financial Report. The
actuarial assumptions and methods used are described in the 2025 Annual
Report to the Comptroller on Actuarial Assumptions, and the Codes, Rules
and Regulations of the State of New York: Audit and Control. The fair
value of assets and GASB disclosures can be found in the 2025 Financial
Statements and Supplementary Information.
Assumptions, demographics, and other considerations may have been
modified to better reflect specific provisions of any proposed benefit
change(s).
This fiscal note does not constitute a legal opinion on the viability
of the bill, nor is it intended to serve as a substitute for the profes-
sional judgment of an attorney.
This estimate, dated April 17, 2026, and intended for use only during
the 2026 Legislative Session, is Fiscal Note Number 2026-181. As Chief
Actuary of the New York State and Local Retirement System (NYSLRS), I,
Aaron Schottin Young, hereby certify that this analysis complies with
applicable Actuarial Standards of Practice as well as the Code of
Professional Conduct and Qualification Standards for Actuaries Issuing
Statements of Actuarial Opinion of the American Academy of Actuaries, of
which I am a member. I am a member of NYSLRS but do not believe it
impairs my objectivity.